Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1650.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Home Preservation Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Existing home repair programs." Programs administered by nonprofit organizations, governmental entities and public 12345678910111213141516 utilities, or the contractors and assignees of those entities, that provide services to repair residential housing and that are funded in accordance with or through, but not exclusively limited to, the following programs:(1) The weatherization assistance programs administered as a part of the programs authorized under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 94 Subch. II (relating to low-income home energy assistance) or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 81 Subch. III (relating to energy conservation and renewable-resource assistance for existing buildings).(2) The Community Development Block Grant Program under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 69 (relating to community development).(3) The HOME program under the act of December 18, 1992 (P.L.1376, No.172), known as the Pennsylvania Affordable Housing Act.(4) The Medical Assistance Community Health Choices Program.(5) The Pennsylvania Housing Affordability and Rehabilitation Enhancement Program under Article IV-D of the act of December 3, 1959 (P.L.1688, No.621), known as the Housing Finance Agency Law.(6) The Keystone Communities Program administered by the department.(7) Low-income usage reduction programs established under 52 Pa. Code Ch. 58 (relating to residential low income usage reduction programs).(8) The Energy Efficiency and Conservation Program established under 66 Pa.C.S. § 2806.1(b)(1)(i)(G) (relating to energy efficiency and conservation program)."Local government." Any county, city, home rule municipality, town, borough or township in this Commonwealth 20250HB1650PN1972 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that have experience creating or implementing programs that restore or rehabilitate units."Program." The Pennsylvania Home Preservation Grant Program established under section 3."Unit." An owner-occupied house, condominium or other dwelling area designed and used as a home for a single household in a residential property.Section 3. Establishment.The Pennsylvania Home Preservation Grant Program is established in the department for the purpose of providing grants to local governments to improve existing housing stock in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Eligible applicants.Consistent with section 10, a local government or a combination of local governments, as determined by the department that have experience creating or implementing programs that restore or rehabilitate units, shall be eligible to apply for a grant under this act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a local government that receives a grant from the program from subgranting the money to another entity approved by the department to perform any of the purposes specified in section 5. A local government that subgrants money received under the program to another entity shall notify the department. The department shall maintain a list of the applicants and subgrantees' public contact information on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 5. Eligible uses.Money awarded under the program shall be used to create or implement programs that will restore or rehabilitate units in this Commonwealth under section 6. Eligible applicants may use 20250HB1650PN1972 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 up to 10% of the grant award for administration related expenses, including personnel expenses. The department may award additional grant money for the administration of applications submitted jointly by two or more local governments.Section 6. Requirements.Expenditures by a local government or subgrantee under this act may not exceed $50,000 per unit and must be used to:(1) Address habitability concerns of units, improve energy or water efficiency of units or to make units accessible for individuals.(2) Fund repairs for a unit owner whose household income does not exceed 80% to 120% of the area median income, as determined by the department.Section 7. Grant application.A local government may apply to the department for a grant on an application form as prescribed by the department. The application shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website and shall contain the following:(1) The geographic boundary of the applicant's program.(2) A description of how the grant money will be utilized.(3) A description of how the receipt and utilization of grant money will meet the requirements of section 6 of this act.(4) An affirmation demonstrating recent experience in the administration of programs that restore or rehabilitate units.(5) Additional funding sources that will be utilized, if any, to further support the grant.(6) Any other information as required by the department.20250HB1650PN1972 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 8. Department review.The department shall review and approve grant applications on a schedule and in a manner as determined by the department. Priority shall be given to applications that demonstrate:(1) Other non-State funding sources are secured for the applicant's program.(2) The intent and ability to coordinate with and, where possible, utilize funds from existing home repair programs.Section 9. Grant funds.Grants under the program shall be made from funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the program and other Federal or State funds the department may receive for the program. The department may use up to 3% of funds appropriated for the administration of the program.Section 10. Limitations.Grant awards under the program shall be competitive and based on the need for funds demonstrated by eligible applicants. Counties must have encumbered 75% of all available funds from the county's allocations of the Whole-Home Repairs Program in order to be eligible for program funding.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1650PN1972 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122